Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB449.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6389. Study to determine drug abuse by parents within resource families.(a) Study.--A study shall be conducted by a research entity regarding the prevalence of drug abuse by each parent within a resource family or prospective resource family to:(1) Ensure that a child in need of services under this chapter is placed in a home environment that is free from the injurious effects associated with drug abuse by a parent within the resource family with whom the child is or will be residing.12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Determine whether:(i) Mandatory drug screening should be required for all parents within a resource family or prospective resource family.(ii) Investment in new technology for caseworkers is warranted to facilitate the recording, retrieval, transmission and analysis of observations of caseworkers regarding drug abuse by a parent within a resource family or prospective resource family.(iii) Cost-effective treatment options exist for a parent within a resource family or prospective resource family who is abusing drugs.(b) Selection and Advisory Council.--(1) The Selection and Advisory Council is established to administer the provisions of this section.(2) After sufficient money has been appropriated or otherwise made available to the council, the council shall:(i) Publicize the request for proposals for the study and solicit applicants to conduct the study and compile the required reports.(ii) Evaluate organizations applying to conduct the study and compile the required reports.(iii) Select an organization to conduct the study and compile the required reports.(iv) Develop benchmarks for the study.(v) Monitor the progress of the study.(vi) Advise the research entity on matters related to the study.(vii) Provide information to the General Assembly on matters related to the study.20250SB0449PN0412 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (viii) Develop necessary procedures to implement and administer the provisions of this section.(3) The council shall consist of the following members:(i) Five members with experience in managing or participating in projects involving managed research methods and analysis, who shall be appointed as follows:(A) One member shall be appointed by the Governor.(B) One member shall be appointed by the President pro tempore of the Senate.(C) One member shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the Senate.(D) One member shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.(E) One member shall be appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of Representatives.(ii) The secretary or a designee.(iii) The Secretary of Education or a designee.(4) The members of the council shall select a chairperson from within the council's membership.(5) Each member of the council shall serve for the duration of the study, but a member may be removed for cause by the member's appointing authority. If a vacancy occurs, the vacancy shall be filled by the appointing authority subject to the conditions of the original appointment.(6) Four members of the council shall constitute a quorum for conducting the business of the council.(7) The council shall meet in person at least quarterly and at other times at the call of the chairperson.(8) A member of the council may not receive compensation 20250SB0449PN0412 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for services as a member of the council but shall be entitled to reimbursement for all necessary and reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the performance of the member's official duties as a member of the council.(c) Study data and findings.--As part of the study, t he research entity shall:(1) Partner with three county agencies representing urban or rural counties, or both, throughout this Commonwealth and reflecting the geographic diversity of this Commonwealth, along with two public or private agencies that contract with each of those county agencies to provide resource families for children who need out-of-home placement. If a county agency under this paragraph does not contract with at least two public or private agencies to provide resource families, the research entity shall partner with the one public or private agency that does contract with the county agency under this paragraph.(2) Determine the number of current and prospective resource families served by the partnering county agencies.(3) With respect to the public and private agencies under this subsection, arrange for sufficient numbers of parents within a resource family or prospective resource family to be screened under subsection (a)(2)(i).(4) O btain valid and reliable data on the number of resource families or prospective resource families with a parent who is abusing drugs, including the types of drugs being abused by the parent and the frequency of the drug use.(5) Identify and determine the effectiveness and efficiency of handheld mobile devices and software to record, retrieve, transmit and analyze the observations of 20250SB0449PN0412 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 caseworkers regarding drug abuse by a parent within a resource family or prospective resource family.(6) Equip agency caseworkers with mobile devices and train the caseworkers in the use of the devices.(7) Establish an efficient storage and retrieval system for the information captured by the mobile devices.(8) Evaluate and recommend cost-effective treatment options for a parent within a resource family or prospective resource family who is abusing drugs.(9) Analyze the use of State-permitted drug testing facilities.(10) Evaluate the costs and benefits of a drug screening program for a parent within a resource family or prospective resource family who is abusing drugs.(11) Determine the possible extent of voluntary participation in drug treatment programs by a parent within a resource family or prospective resource family who is abusing drugs.(d) Quarterly reports.--The research entity shall provide a quarterly progress report regarding the study challenges, fiscal status and milestone accomplishments to:(1) The Governor.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Committee on Aging and Youth of the Senate.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Committee on Children and Youth of the House of Representatives.(4) The members of the council.(e) Final report.--The research entity shall complete the study and issue a final report of its findings and 20250SB0449PN0412 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 recommendations:(1) to the individuals listed under subsection (d); and(2) within 24 months after receipt of funding to conduct the study.(f) De finitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Council." The Selection and Advisory Council established under subsection (b)."Research entity." The organization selected to conduct the study under subsection (b)(2)(iii).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0449PN0412 - 6 - 123456789101112